West Virginia, session 2026, SB455.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. Part I. General Authority and Duties of the Department of Health and Human Resources. §49-2-131.  Financial support for kinship parents and fictive kin as provided to certified foster parents. (a) The state shall ensure that all available financial support and resources that are currently available to certified foster parents will be given to kinship parents and fictive kin. Neither kinship parents nor fictive kin shall be required to become certified. A safety check and background check are still required for placement.  (b) This covers all support that is presently provided to foster parents in this article.